Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-406
Nebraska Art Collection; displayed; where; manner.

Art collected under sections 82-401 to 82-408 may be displayed in museums, government buildings, schools, hospitals, libraries, public malls, community theaters, colleges and universities, state and county fairs, city halls, county courthouses, and other public places. It may be placed on temporary loan or displayed through traveling displays. Efforts should be made to display the art as widely throughout the state as possible in places where it is accessible to the public.

Laws 1979, LB 116, § 6.